Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7712
Applicability of act.

The Model Act Regarding Use of Credit Information in Personal Insurance applies to personal insurance policies either written to be effective or renewed on or after nine months after August 31, 2003.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 12.